Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB41.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
By January 1, 2026, each hospital licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall:
(1) Establish policies and procedures to improve care for sickle cell disease patients
during hospital and emergency room visits, including:
(a) Expedited pain management protocols implementing standardized
procedures to prioritize pain relief for sickle cell disease patients within
thirty (30) minutes of arrival;
(b) Sickle cell disease care medical care teams trained in sickle cell disease
crisis management for hospital emergency rooms; and
(c) Required training for all emergency room staff on sickle cell disease that
focuses on recognizing pain episodes, addressing care and treatment bias,
and providing culturally competent care;
(2) Develop programs to prevent and address addiction risks for sickle cell disease
patients, including:
(a) Alternative pain management options including nonopioid pain
management techniques such as cognitive behavioral therapy and
integrative medicine; and
(b) Accessible addiction treatment specifically designed for sickle cell disease
patients who have developed opioid dependence to ensure a holistic and
compassionate approach to recovery; and
(3) Provide patients with education and resources, including:
(a) Self-efficiency education on managing sickle cell disease as a chronic
illness and promoting independence rather than dependence on frequent
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/11/2024 1:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 495
hospital care; and
(b) Financial literacy workshops to help patients budget and manage finances
during extended hospital stays for sickle cell disease care.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/11/2024 1:39 PM Jacketed